Illinois, session 104th, HB3392.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act is 5amended by changing Sections 15, 35, 70, 135, and 150 as 6follows: 7    (210 ILCS 9/15)8    Sec. 15. Assessment and service plan requirements. Prior 9to admission to any establishment covered by this Act, a 10comprehensive assessment that includes an evaluation of the 11prospective resident's physical, cognitive, and psychosocial 12condition shall be completed by a physician, a physician 13assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse. At least 14annually, a comprehensive assessment shall be completed, and 15upon identification of a significant change in the resident's 16condition, including, but not limited to, a diagnosis of 17Alzheimer's disease or a related dementia, the resident shall 18be reassessed. The Department may by rule specify 19circumstances under which more frequent assessments of skin 20integrity and nutritional status shall be required. The 21comprehensive assessment shall be completed by a physician, a 22physician assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse. 23Based on the assessment, the resident's interests and   HB3392 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10477 BAB 20552 b1preferences, dislikes, and any known triggers for behavior 2that endangers the resident or others, a written service plan 3shall be developed and mutually agreed upon by the provider, 4the resident, and the resident's representative, if any. The 5service plan, which shall be reviewed annually, or more often 6as the resident's condition, preferences, or service needs 7change, shall serve as a basis for the service delivery 8contract between the provider and the resident. The resident 9and the resident's representative, if any, shall, upon 10request, be given a copy of the most recent assessment; a 11supplemental assessment, if any, completed by the 12establishment; and a service plan. Based on the assessment, 13the service plan may provide for the disconnection or removal 14of any appliance. 15(Source: P.A. 104-191, eff. 1-1-26.) 16    (210 ILCS 9/35)17    Sec. 35. Issuance of license. 18    (a) Upon receipt and review of an application for a 19license and review of the applicant establishment, the 20Director may issue a license if he or she finds: 21        (1) that the individual applicant, or the corporation, 22    partnership, or other entity if the applicant is not an 23    individual, is a person responsible and suitable to 24    operate or to direct or participate in the operation of an 25    establishment by virtue of financial capacity, appropriate   HB3392 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10477 BAB 20552 b1    business or professional experience, a record of lawful 2    compliance with lawful orders of the Department and lack 3    of revocation of a license issued under this Act, the 4    Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental Health 5    Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community Care Act, 6    or the MC/DD Act during the previous 5 years; 7        (2) that the establishment is under the supervision of 8    a full-time director who is at least 21 years of age and 9    has a high school diploma or equivalent plus either:10            (A) 2 years of management experience or 2 years of 11        experience in positions of progressive responsibility 12        in health care, housing with services, or adult day 13        care or providing similar services to the elderly; or14            (B) 2 years of management experience or 2 years of 15        experience in positions of progressive responsibility 16        in hospitality and training in health care and housing 17        with services management as defined by rule; or 18            (C) a college degree in health administration or 19        the completion of an approved program within 6 months 20        after hiring; 21        (3) that the establishment has staff sufficient in 22    number with qualifications, adequate skills, education, 23    and experience to meet the 24 hour scheduled and 24    unscheduled needs of residents and who participate in 25    ongoing training to serve the resident population; 26        (4) that all employees who are subject to the Health   HB3392 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10477 BAB 20552 b1    Care Worker Background Check Act meet the requirements of 2    that Act; 3        (5) that the applicant is in substantial compliance 4    with this Act and such other requirements for a license as 5    the Department by rule may establish under this Act; 6        (6) that the applicant pays all required fees; 7        (7) that the applicant has provided to the Department 8    an accurate disclosure document in accordance with the 9    Alzheimer's Disease and Related Dementias Special Care 10    Disclosure Act and in substantial compliance with Section 11    150 of this Act.12    In addition to any other requirements set forth in this 13Act, as a condition of licensure under this Act, the director 14of an establishment must participate in at least 20 hours of 15training every 2 years to assist him or her in better meeting 16the needs of the residents of the establishment and managing 17the operation of the establishment. 18    Any license issued by the Director shall state the 19physical location of the establishment, the date the license 20was issued, and the expiration date. All licenses shall be 21valid for one year, except as provided in Sections 40 and 45. 22Each license shall be issued only for the premises and persons 23named in the application, and shall not be transferable or 24assignable.25(Source: P.A. 98-104, eff. 7-22-13; 99-180, eff. 7-29-15.)   HB3392 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10477 BAB 20552 b1    (210 ILCS 9/70)2    Sec. 70. Service requirements. An establishment must 3provide all mandatory services and may provide optional 4services, including medication reminders, supervision of 5self-administered medication and medication administration as 6defined by this Section and nonmedical services defined by 7rule, whether provided directly by the establishment or by 8another entity arranged for by the establishment with the 9consent of the resident or the resident's representative.10    For the purposes of this Section, "medication reminders" 11means reminding residents to take pre-dispensed, 12self-administered medication, observing the resident, and 13documenting whether or not the resident took the medication.14    For the purposes of this Section, "supervision of 15self-administered medication" means assisting the resident 16with self-administered medication using any combination of the 17following: reminding residents to take medication, reading the 18medication label to residents, checking the self-administered 19medication dosage against the label of the medication, 20confirming that residents have obtained and are taking the 21dosage as prescribed, and documenting in writing that the 22resident has taken (or refused to take) the medication. If 23residents are physically unable to open the container, the 24container may be opened for them. Supervision of 25self-administered medication shall be under the direction of a 26licensed health care professional or, in the case of a   HB3392 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10477 BAB 20552 b1certified medication aide, under the supervision and 2delegation of a registered nurse as authorized by Section 350-75 of the Nurse Practice Act.4    For the purposes of this Section, "medication 5administration" refers to a licensed health care professional 6employed by an establishment engaging in administering insulin 7and vitamin B12 B-12 injections, oral medications, topical 8treatments, eye and ear drops, or nitroglycerin patches, or 9intramuscular injections. A certified medication aide may 10administer medications under the supervision and delegation of 11a registered nurse as authorized by Section 50-75 of the Nurse 12Practice Act, except (i) Schedule II controlled substances as 13set forth in the Illinois Controlled Substances Act and (ii) 14any subcutaneous, intramuscular, intradermal, or intravenous 15medication. 16    The Department shall specify by rule procedures for 17medication reminders, supervision of self-administered 18medication, and medication administration.19    Nothing in this Act shall preclude a physician licensed 20under the Medical Practice Act of 1987 from providing services 21within the scope of his or her license to any resident.22(Source: P.A. 103-886, eff. 8-9-24.) 23    (210 ILCS 9/135)24    Sec. 135. Civil penalties. 25    (a) The Department may assess a civil penalty not to   HB3392 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10477 BAB 20552 b1exceed $5,000 against any establishment subject to this Act 2for violations of this Act. Each day a violation continues 3shall be deemed a separate violation.4    (b) Beginning 180 days after the adoption of rules under 5this Act, the Department may assess a civil penalty not to 6exceed $3,000 against any establishment subject to this Act 7for caring for a resident who exceeds the care needs defined in 8this Act. Each day a violation continues shall be deemed a 9separate violation.10    (c) The Department is authorized to hold hearings in 11contested cases regarding appeals of the penalties assessed 12pursuant to this Section.13    (d) Repeated technical infractions within a calendar year 14may result in a Type 3 violation. 15(Source: P.A. 91-656, eff. 1-1-01.) 16    (210 ILCS 9/150)17    Sec. 150. Alzheimer and dementia programs. 18    (a) In addition to this Section, Alzheimer and dementia 19programs shall comply with all of the other provisions of this 20Act.21    (b) No person shall be admitted or retained if the 22assisted living or shared housing establishment cannot provide 23or secure appropriate care, if the resident requires a level 24of service or type of service for which the establishment is 25not licensed or which the establishment does not provide, or   HB3392 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10477 BAB 20552 b1if the establishment does not have the staff appropriate in 2numbers and with appropriate skill to provide such services.3    (c) No person shall be accepted for residency or remain in 4residence if the person's mental or physical condition has so 5deteriorated to render residency in such a program to be 6detrimental to the health, welfare or safety of the person or 7of other residents of the establishment. The Department by 8rule shall identify a validated dementia-specific standard 9with inter-rater reliability that will be used to assess 10individual residents. The assessment must be approved by the 11resident's physician, physician assistant who has experience 12in geriatric dementia care, or advanced practice registered 13nurse who has experience in geriatric dementia care and shall 14occur prior to acceptance for residency, annually, and at such 15time that a change in the resident's condition is identified 16by a family member, staff of the establishment, or the 17resident's physician, physician assistant, or advanced 18practice registered nurse. Assessments completed annually or 19due to a change in the resident's condition must be signed by a 20physician. 21    (d) No person shall be accepted for residency or remain in 22residence if the person is dangerous to self or others and the 23establishment would be unable to eliminate the danger through 24the use of appropriate treatment modalities.25    (e) No person shall be accepted for residency or remain in 26residence if the person meets the criteria provided in   HB3392 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 10477 BAB 20552 b1subsections (b) through (g) of Section 75 of this Act.2    (f) An establishment that offers to provide a special 3program or unit for persons with Alzheimer's disease and 4related disorders shall:5        (1) disclose to the Department and to a potential or 6    actual resident of the establishment information as 7    specified under the Alzheimer's Disease and Related 8    Dementias Special Care Disclosure Act;9        (2) ensure that a resident's representative is 10    designated for the resident;11        (3) develop and implement policies and procedures that 12    ensure the continued safety of all residents in the 13    establishment, including, but not limited to, those who:14            (A) may wander; and15            (B) may need supervision and assistance when 16        evacuating the building in an emergency;17        (4) provide coordination of communications with each 18    resident, resident's representative, relatives and other 19    persons identified in the resident's service plan;20        (5) provide cognitive stimulation and activities to 21    maximize functioning;22        (6) provide an appropriate number of staff for its 23    resident population, as established by rule;24        (7) require the director or administrator and direct 25    care staff to complete sufficient comprehensive and 26    ongoing dementia and cognitive deficit training, the   HB3392 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 10477 BAB 20552 b1    content of which shall be established by rule; and2        (8) develop emergency procedures and staffing patterns 3    to respond to the needs of residents.4    (g) Individual residents shall be assessed prior to 5admission using assessment tools that are approved or 6recommended by recognized Alzheimer's and dementia care 7experts, ensuring that the tools are validated for accurately 8identifying and evaluating cognitive impairments related to 9Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia. These tools 10shall be reviewed and updated as needed to align with current 11best practices and clinical standards in dementia care. 12(Source: P.A. 104-295, eff. 1-1-26.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.